Hawaii statutes.
[§466-37] Retention of documents. (a)
Each reviewer shall maintain all documentation necessary to establish that each
review conforms to the review standards of the relevant review program,
including the review working papers, copies of the review report, and any
correspondence indicating the firm's concurrence and non-concurrence, along
with any proposed remedial actions and any related implementation.

(b) The documents described in subsection (a)
shall be retained by the reviewer for a period of time corresponding to the
retention period of the sponsoring organization, and upon request of the board,
shall be made available to the board; provided that the document shall be
retained for at least one hundred twenty days after the date of completion of the
review by the sponsoring organization. [L 2012, c 324, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next